District of Columbia statutes.
29-1114

Duties of member.

(a)

A member shall not have a fiduciary duty to an unincorporated nonprofit association or to another member solely by being a member.

(b)

A member shall discharge the duties to the unincorporated nonprofit association and the other members and exercise any rights under this chapter consistent with the governing principles and the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1123.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 18 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).